Louisiana, session 2026, SB77.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Arts. 2674, 2681, 2711, 2712, and 2713 are hereby amended
and reenacted and Section 5 of Chapter 2 of Title IX of Book III of the Civil Code, to be
comprised of Civil Code Arts. 2681.1 and 2681.2, and Civil Code Art. 2713.1 are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
Art. 2674. Ownership of the thing
A lease of a thing that does not belong to the lessor may nevertheless be
binding on the parties.
A lease of a corporeal movable that does not belong to the lessor has
effect against the owner if the lessor has possession of the thing with the consent
of the owner, is a merchant customarily selling or leasing similar things, and
leases the thing for fair value in the regular course of the lessor's business to a
lessee in good faith.
Revision Comments – 2026
(a) The second paragraph of this Article is new. It articulates a rule that aligns
with the principles set forth in Article 520 and with the doctrine of entrustment found
in the Uniform Commercial Code. See U.C.C. Sections 2-403 and 2A-305(2). Under
Article 520, a merchant in possession of a corporeal movable with the owner's
consent may transfer ownership of the movable in the regular course of business to
a transferee who is in good faith and pays fair value. That provision is designed to
protect the rights of persons who reasonably and honestly believe that the person
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 77 ENROLLED
with whom they are dealing has the power to transfer the movable. In the same vein,
this Article protects a lessee who leases from someone who he reasonably and
honestly believes has the power to lease the movable. For example, if the owner of
a corporeal movable places it in the possession of a repairperson who also
customarily sells or leases things of the same kind, and the repairperson leases the
thing for fair value during the regular course of its business to a lessee in good faith,
the lease has effect against the owner of the thing. Similarly, this Article protects a
sublessee of a merchant who subleases a corporeal movable beyond the terms of the
prime lease, provided that the sublease is executed for fair value in the regular course
of the merchant's business to a sublessee in good faith. In this way, this Article
operates as an exception to the general limitation on the rights of sublessees stated
in Article 2713.1 and is consistent with U.C.C. Section 2A-305(2).
(b) The term "possession," as used in this Article and in Article 520, refers
to precarious possession, which is defined in Article 3437 as the exercise of
possession over a thing with the permission of or on behalf of the owner or
possessor. See A.N. Yiannopoulos & Ronald J. Scalise, Jr., Louisiana Civil Law
Treatise: Property §12:20.
(c) The concept of good faith adopted in this Article derives from Article 523,
according to which an acquirer of a corporeal movable is in good faith unless he
knows, or should have known, that the transferor was not the owner. Under that
Article, good faith is presumed. See Brown and Root, Inc. v. Southeast Equipment
Co., Inc. 470 So. 2d 516 (La. App. 1 Cir. 1985). If, however, the acquirer has notice
of facts that would put a reasonably prudent person on inquiry, the acquirer is under
a duty to investigate with the view of ascertaining the true situation. See Article 523,
cmt. (b). By analogy, a lessee is in good faith unless he has actual or constructive
knowledge that his lessor exceeds his right to lease the thing.
(d) When the lease of a thing that does not belong to the lessor has effect
against the owner under the second paragraph of this Article, the owner may not
evict the lessee. Absent an agreement to the contrary, however, the owner is not the
lessor, is not personally bound by the lessor's obligations, and is not subrogated to
the rights of the lessor under the lease. The owner may have a delictual or contractual
action against the lessor, depending upon the circumstances, for any loss that the
owner sustains as a result of the lease.
(e) The second paragraph of this Article does not apply when a lease is
binding on the owner by operation of the law of mandate, according to which a lease
made by someone other than the owner of the thing may be binding on the owner due
to the lessor's actual or apparent authority to lease it. See Article 2989 et seq.
* * *
Art. 2681. Form
A lease may be made orally or in writing. A lease of an immovable is not
effective against third persons until filed for recordation in the manner prescribed by
legislation.
SECTION 5. EFFECTS AGAINST THIRD PERSONS
Art. 2681.1. Lease of an immovable
A lease of an immovable has effect against third persons from the time
that it is filed for registry in the manner prescribed by legislation.
Revision Comments – 2026
This revision does not change the law. In the civil law tradition, a lease is a
contract that imposes personal obligations on the lessor and the lessee but does not
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 77 ENROLLED
create real rights. A.N. Yiannopoulos & Ronald J. Scalise, Jr., Louisiana Civil Law
Treatise: Property §9:26. Absent legislation to the contrary, a lease has no effect
against one who is not a party to or bound by the lease. Id. With respect to
immovables, Louisiana legislation and jurisprudence have long provided that a lease
of an immovable has effect against third persons once it is filed for registry in the
conveyance records of the parish where the immovable is located. See R.S.
9:2721(A) (repealed); Articles 3338 and 3346; Summers v. Clark, 30 La. Ann. 436
(La. 1878); Tate v. Fakouri, 118 So. 2d 464 (La. App. 1 Cir. 1959); Avenue Plaza,
L.L.C. v. Falgoust, 654 So. 2d 838 (La. App. 4 Cir. 1995).
Art. 2681.2. Lease of a movable
A lease of a corporeal movable has effect against third persons upon
actual delivery of the movable to the lessee who is in good faith and ceases to
have that effect when the thing is returned to the lessor or his successor.
Revision Comments – 2026
(a) This Article is new. In the civil law tradition, a lease is a contract that
imposes personal obligations on the lessor and the lessee but does not create real
rights. A.N. Yiannopoulos & Ronald J. Scalise, Jr., Louisiana Civil Law Treatise:
Property §9:26. Absent legislation to the contrary, a lease has no effect against one
who is not a party to or bound by it. Id. Article 2733 of the Civil Code of 1870
provided that the purchaser of a leased thing "can not turn out the tenant before his
lease has expired, unless the contrary has been stipulated in the contract." That article
was repealed in the 2004 revision of the title on "Lease" and replaced with Article
2711, which provides instead that "[t]he transfer of the leased thing does not
terminate the lease, unless the contrary had been agreed between the lessor and the
lessee." While the 2004 Revision Comments to Article 2711 suggest that the lease
of a movable has effect against third persons "because [a transferee's] right to use
[the leased thing] has been alienated prior to his acquisition," the repeal of Article
2733 of the Civil Code of 1870 cast doubt on that proposition. This revision
explicitly adopts a rule that a lease of a corporeal movable is effective against third
persons upon actual delivery of the movable to the lessee, provided that the lessee
is in good faith.
(b) This rule is consistent with the modern civil law approach to leases of
movables, which affords some protections for the lessee against third persons. For
example, in France a good faith lessee in actual possession is preferred over a
subsequent lessee of the movable. See 20 Baudry-Lacantinerie & Wahl, Traité
théorique et pratique de droit civil français Nos 138–45 (3d ed. 1906); cf. Fr. C. Civ.
Art. 1198. While French law generally adheres to the traditional view that a lease of
a movable is not enforceable against a subsequent purchaser of the thing, modern
commentators take the view that the purchaser of a leased movable ought to be
bound to the lease if the lease was by authentic act or if the lease was made known
to the purchaser. See, e.g., Philippe Malaurie et al., Droit civil – Contrats spéciaux
No. 621 (10th ed. 2018); 10 Planiol & Ripert, Traité pratique de droit civil français
No. 732 (2d ed. 1956); 5 Aubry & Rau, Droit civil français §369 at 278 n.31 (6th ed.
1952). Under German and Greek law, in the case of successive leases of the same
thing, the person who first takes delivery in good faith prevails. In the event of an
alienation of the leased thing, if the lessee has taken delivery in good faith before the
alienation, the new owner is relegated to the possession of the thing subject to the
lessee's right of detention. See 2 Karl Larenz, Lehrbuch des Schuldrechts
(Besonderer Teil) 240-41 (13th ed. 1986); 1 Ioannis Delegiannis & Panagiotis
Kornilakis, Special Law of Obligations 453 n.1, 454 (1992).
(c) The Uniform Commercial Code also provides for the enforceability of a
lease of goods against third persons. U.C.C. Section 2A-301 provides: "Except as
otherwise provided…a lease contract is effective and enforceable according to its
terms between the parties, against purchasers of the goods and against creditors of
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 77 ENROLLED
the parties." Moreover, under U.C.C. Section 2A-302, a lease is effective "whether
the lessor, the lessee, or a third party has possession of the goods." Thus, under
U.C.C. Article 2A, a lease of goods is effective against third persons by virtue of the
very existence of the lease contract. The rule adopted in this Article is narrower than
the U.C.C. approach, as the protections conferred by this Article are dependent upon
the lessee's good faith and actual delivery to the lessee.
(d) This Article requires "actual delivery" of the movable to the lessee for the
lease to be effective against third persons. "Actual delivery," which occurs when the
movable is physically handed over to the lessee, is contrasted with "constructive
delivery," which occurs when the transfer of possession is not physical but is instead
symbolized by other actions or agreements, such as handing over the key to the place
where the item is stored, negotiating a document of title, or even by the mere consent
of the parties if the thing cannot be transported at the time of the lease. See Article
2477 and cmt. (b).
(e) The effectiveness of the lease against third persons is dependent upon the
lessee's good faith. For example, in the case of successive leases, a subsequent lease
is enforceable against the first lessee if the subsequent lessee takes actual delivery
first in time and is in good faith. The concept of good faith adopted in this Article
derives from Article 523, according to which an acquirer of a corporeal movable is
in good faith unless he knows, or should have known, that the transferor was not the
owner. Under that Article, good faith is presumed. See Brown and Root, Inc. v.
Southeast Equipment Co., Inc, 470 So.2d 516 (La. App. 1 Cir. 1985). If, however,
the acquirer has notice of facts that would put a reasonably prudent person on
inquiry, the acquirer is under a duty to investigate with the view of ascertaining the
true situation. See Article 523, cmt. (b). By analogy, a lessee is in good faith unless
he has actual or constructive knowledge of conflicting rights of a third person to the
leased thing.
(f) Under this Article, the effectiveness of the lease against third persons
ceases when the thing is returned to the lessor, whether voluntarily or involuntarily.
If, for example, the lessee temporarily returns the movable to the lessor for repairs,
and, while the thing is in the possession of the lessor, the lessor enters into a new
lease with a subsequent lessee in good faith to whom the lessor actually delivers the
leased movable, the subsequent lessee takes the movable free of the existing lease.
This Article adopts an approach to this problem that is different from that found in
the Uniform Commercial Code. U.C.C. Section 2A-304(2) provides that when the
leased goods are "entrusted" to the lessor, a subsequent lessee in the ordinary course
of business from the lessor obtains the goods free of the existing contract if the lessor
was a merchant dealing in goods of that kind. U.C.C. Section 2-403 provides for the
same result if the lessor, having been "entrusted" with the goods during the lease,
sells them to a third person. By contrast, under this Article, a subsequent lessee or
transferee of a lessor to whom the thing has been returned acquires the thing free of
the existing lease regardless of whether the lessor is a merchant and irrespective of
whether the subsequent transfer was made in the regular course of the lessor's
business. The rule set forth in this Article applies whether the thing is returned to the
lessor or the lessor's successor. In this context, "successor" has the meaning provided
in Article 3506.
(g) This Article alone does not address all possible disputes that may arise
between a lessee of a corporeal movable and a third person to the lease. For example,
to resolve contests between a lessee and a transferee of the same corporeal movable,
this Article must be read in pari materia with Article 518, which provides that the
transfer of ownership of a corporeal movable takes place against third persons when
the possession of the movable is delivered to the transferee, and if possession has not
yet been delivered, then a subsequent transferee in good faith to whom possession
is delivered acquires ownership. If the lessee takes actual delivery of the thing in
good faith before the transferee takes possession of it, then the lessee prevails. By
contrast, if the transferee takes possession of the thing in good faith before the lessee
takes actual delivery of it, then the transferee prevails. Contests may also arise
between the lessee and a third person who claims a right in the thing by virtue of the
dissolution, simulation, or nullity of the contract by which the lessor obtained the
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 77 ENROLLED
thing. In those cases, this Article must be read in pari materia with Articles 2021,
2028, and 2035. For example, under Article 2035, the nullity of a contract does not
impair the rights acquired through an onerous contract by a third person in good
faith. Thus, if the lessor's seller annuls the sale by which the lessor obtained
ownership of the leased thing on grounds of fraud or error, the lease is enforceable
against the seller only if the lessee took actual delivery of the thing in good faith
before the sale was declared null. This result is in line with the Uniform Commercial
Code, according to which a lessor with "voidable title" has the power to transfer a
good leasehold interest to a "good faith subsequent lessee for value." See U.C.C.
Section 2A-304(1).
(h) This Article does not address the rights of a sublessee against a prime
lessor, as those rights are instead governed by Article 2713.1.
* * *
Art. 2711. Transfer of thing by lessor does not terminate lease
The transfer of the leased thing by the lessor does not terminate the lease,
unless the contrary had been agreed between the lessor and the lessee. The lessee
has an action against the lessor for any loss that the lessee sustains as a result
of the transfer.
Revision Comments – 2026
(a) This revision does not change the law. This Article combines former
Articles 2711 and 2712 to make clear that the principle stated in the second sentence
of former Article 2712 applies equally to movables and immovables. As under prior
law, the transfer of the leased thing does not terminate the lease, which continues to
have effects between the lessor and lessee. This is consistent with the principle that
"[a] lease of a thing that does not belong to the lessor may nevertheless be binding
on the parties," Article 2674, and that "ownership of the thing by the lessor is not an
essential element of the contract of lease." Id., cmt. (c).
(b) Following a transfer of a leased thing, the lessee has an action against the
lessor for any loss that the lessee sustains as a result of the transfer. For example, if
the lease was not enforceable against third persons at the time of the transfer and the
lessor transfers the leased thing to a person who exercises the right to evict the lessee
before the end of the term, the lessor has failed to perform obligations under the
warranty of peaceful possession. See Article 2700. The consequences of this breach
are determined under the law of conventional obligations and may consist of
injunctive relief, dissolution of the lease, or damages, according to the
circumstances. See id., cmt. (b).
(c) As under prior law, the continuation of the lease following transfer of the
leased thing and the lessee's rights against the lessor following the transfer are
matters of suppletive law and may be modified or negated by the parties' agreement.
Art. 2712. Transfer of immovable subject to unrecorded lease thing does not
transfer rights and obligations of lease
A third person who acquires an immovable that is subject to an unrecorded
lease is not bound by the lease.
In the absence of a contrary provision in the lease contract, the lessee has an
action against the lessor for any loss the lessee sustained as a result of the transfer.
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 77 ENROLLED
The transferee of a thing that is subject to a lease is not legally
subrogated to the rights of his transferor and is not personally bound by the
transferor's obligations under the lease unless the transferee assumes them.
Revision Comments – 2026
This revision does not change the law. This Article restates the principle of
Article 1764 that a particular successor, that is, one who acquires a thing by
particular title, is not bound by the personal obligations of the transferor with respect
to the thing, unless the particular successor has assumed those obligations. A
particular successor likewise does not acquire any personal rights of the transferor
in the absence of a conventional subrogation to those rights by the transferor. See
Article 1764, cmt. (d). In the context of lease, this means that, unless there is an
agreement to the contrary, the transferee of a thing that is subject to lease does not
become the lessor, is not bound by the lessor's obligations, and does not enjoy the
lessor's rights in the lease. If the lessor has not assigned the right to the rent to the
transferee, the lessee remains obligated to pay rent to the lessor and may not refuse
to pay rent or perform his other obligations because of the lessor's lack of ownership.
Art. 2713. Lessee's right Right to sublease, assign, or encumber
The Each party has the right to assign or encumber his rights in the
lease, and the lessee has the right to sublease the leased thing or to assign or
encumber his rights in the lease, unless. These rights may be expressly prohibited
by the contract of lease, except as otherwise provided by legislation.
A provision in a lease of an immovable that prohibits one of these rights the
right of the lessee to assign, encumber, or sublease is deemed to prohibit the
others, unless a contrary intent is expressed. In all other respects, a provision that
prohibits subleasing, the lessee of an immovable from assigning, or encumbering,
or subleasing is to be strictly construed against the lessor.
Revision Comments – 2026
(a) This revision makes explicit that the lessor has the right to assign or
encumber his rights in the lease, unless expressly prohibited by the contract of lease.
Prior law addressed only the right of the lessee to assign or encumber his rights in
the lease or to sublease the leased thing.
(b) The parties' freedom to restrict the lessor's rights under this Article may
be curtailed by other law. See, e.g., Article 3163 (leases of immovables); R.S. 10:9-
407 (leases of movables).
(c) The second paragraph of this Article changes the law in part. Under the
previous version of this Article, a provision in the lease, whether of movables or
immovables, that prohibited subleasing, assigning, or encumbering was deemed to
prohibit the others, unless a contrary intent was expressed, and in all other respects,
a provision prohibiting subleasing, assigning, or encumbering was to be strictly
construed against the lessor. This revision continues that rule of construction of
leases of immovables, but such a construction does not apply to leases of movables.
The interpretation of a lease of movables, like any contract, is governed by the
general rules governing the interpretation of conventional obligations. See Articles
2045 through 2057.
Page 6 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 77 ENROLLED
Art. 2713.1. Rights of sublessee or assignee
Except as otherwise provided by legislation, a person to whom a lessee
subleases the thing or assigns his rights in the lease acquires no greater rights
than the lessee to the use and enjoyment of the thing.
Revision Comments – 2026
(a) This Article restates a principle that has long been recognized in the
Louisiana jurisprudence. See Standard Oil Co. of Louisiana v. Joy, 150 So. 443 (La.
App. Orl. 1933); Scott v. Kalip, 197 So. 205 (La. App. 2 Cir. 1940); Ogden v. John
Jay Esthetic Salons, Inc., 470 So. 2d 521 (La. App. 1 Cir. 1985); Brown v. Mayfield,
488 So. 2d 322 (La. App. 3 Cir. 1986). With respect to movable things, the rule set
forth in this Article is equivalent to that set forth in U.C.C Section 2A-305(1): "[A]
buyer or sublessee from the lessee of goods under an existing lease contract obtains,
to the extent of the interest transferred, the leasehold interest in the goods that the
lessee had or had power to transfer, and…takes subject to the existing lease
contract."
(b) As an exception to the general rule found in this Article, Article 2674
allows a good faith sublessee of a corporeal movable to acquire greater rights than
those provided by the prime lease under the limited circumstances described in that
article. This exception is designed to protect the rights of a sublessee who reasonably
and honestly believes that the person with whom he is dealing is not restricted in his
power to lease the movable. See also Article 520.
(c) This Article does not displace other provisions of Louisiana law that
address the rights of a sublessee of a thing vis-à-vis the prime lessor. First, this
Article must be read in pari materia with Article 2681.2, under which a sublease,
like any lease, has effect against third persons, including the prime lessor, upon
actual delivery of the movable to the sublessee in good faith. In cases of dissolution,
simulation, or nullity of the contract by which the sublessor obtained the thing, this
Article must also be read in pari materia with Articles 2021, 2028, and 2035. For
example, under Article 2035, the nullity of a contract does not impair the rights
acquired through an onerous contract by a third person in good faith. Thus, if the
sublessor's lessor annuls the prime lease on grounds of fraud or error, the sublease
remains effective if the sublessee took delivery of the thing in good faith before the
prime lease was declared null. This result is consistent with the Uniform Commercial
Code, according to which a sublessor with a "voidable leasehold interest" has the
power to transfer a good leasehold interest to a "good faith sublessee for value." See
U.C.C. Section 2A-305(1).
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.